Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20173-121
Division; airway and airport; exclusive right prohibited.

The division shall grant no exclusive right for the use of any airway, airport, restricted landing area, or other air navigation facility under its jurisdiction. This section shall not prevent the making of leases in accordance with other provisions of the State Aeronautics Act.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 6(15), p. 87;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 20.